Tennessee, session 114, SB1660.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-14-301, is amended by deleting
subdivision (b)(2) and substituting:
(2) Arson of a place of worship or pregnancy resource center is a Class B felony.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-14-301(c), is amended by adding
the following new subdivision:
( ) "Pregnancy resource center" means a nonprofit organization that provides
care and resources to assist women and families facing difficult or unexpected
pregnancies, including providing counseling, financial assistance, food, clothing, and
medical assistance to pregnant women and reimbursing social service providers who
prepare adoptions throughout the state for services and programs targeting at-risk
women and families with immediate and ongoing needs related to unexpected
pregnancy.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1660
010625
- 1 -